Utah statutes.
10-7-73.   Corporate violation -- Hearing -- Penalty imposed to be a fine.
After the plea of the corporation is entered the court shall fix a time for
the hearing of the cause, and thereafter the proceedings therein shall be the
same as in the cases of natural persons charged with violating a city or town
ordinance, except that in cases of conviction the penalty imposed in all
instances shall be by way of fine.
